Illinois, session 104th, HB5720.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 325    Section 5. The following named sums, or so much of those 6amounts as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 7purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to the Office of 8the Secretary of State to meet the ordinary, contingent, and 9distributive expenses of the following organizational units of 10the Office of the Secretary of State:11EXECUTIVE GROUP12For Personal Services:13  For Regular Positions:14   Payable from General Revenue Fund................6,660,70015  For Extra Help:16   Payable from General Revenue Fund...................92,30017  For Employee Contribution to State 18 Employees' Retirement System:19   Payable from General Revenue Fund..................135,10020   Payable from Road Fund...................................021  For State Contribution to 22 Social Security:23   Payable from General Revenue Fund..................460,300  HB5720- 2 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1  For Contractual Services:2   Payable from General Revenue Fund..................561,8003  For Travel Expenses:4   Payable from General Revenue Fund...................54,7005  For Commodities:6   Payable from General Revenue Fund...................46,2007  For Printing:8   Payable from General Revenue Fund....................1,3009  For Equipment:10   Payable from General Revenue Fund...................21,00011  For Telecommunication services:12   Payable from General Revenue Fund....................3,20013GENERAL ADMINISTRATIVE GROUP14For Personal Services:15  For Regular Positions:16   Payable from General Revenue Fund...............72,307,70017   Payable from Road Fund...................................018   Payable from Lobbyist Registration Fund............668,00019   Payable from Registered Limited 20  Liability Partnership Fund..........................115,90021   Payable from Securities Audit 22  and Enforcement Fund..............................6,590,50023   Payable from Department of Business Services 24  Special Operations Fund...........................8,315,00025  For Extra Help:26   Payable from General Revenue Fund..................651,700  HB5720- 3 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1   Payable from Road Fund...................................02   Payable from Securities Audit 3  and Enforcement Fund.................................34,4004   Payable from Department of Business Services 5  Special Operations Fund.............................174,3006  For Employee Contribution to State 7 Employees' Retirement System:8   Payable from General Revenue Fund................1,459,2009   Payable from Lobbyist Registration Fund.............13,40010   Payable from Registered Limited  11  Liability Partnership Fund............................2,30012   Payable from Securities Audit 13  and Enforcement Fund................................139,10014   Payable from Department of Business Services 15  Special Operations Fund.............................169,80016  For State Contribution to 17 State Employees' Retirement System:18   Payable from Road Fund...................................019   Payable from Lobbyist Registration Fund............306,90020   Payable from Registered Limited 21  Liability Partnership Fund...........................53,20022   Payable from Securities Audit 23  and Enforcement Fund..............................3,043,20024   Payable from Department of Business Services 25  Special Operations Fund...........................3,899,60026  For State Contribution to   HB5720- 4 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1 Social Security:2   Payable from General Revenue Fund................5,446,4003   Payable from Road Fund...................................04   Payable from Lobbyist Registration Fund.............54,0005   Payable from Registered Limited 6  Liability Partnership Fund............................8,4007   Payable from Securities Audit 8  and Enforcement Fund................................433,5009   Payable from Department of Business Services 10  Special Operations Fund.............................629,50011  For Group Insurance:12   Payable from Lobbyist Registration Fund............211,20013   Payable from Registered Limited 14  Liability Partnership Fund...........................70,40015   Payable from Securities Audit 16  and Enforcement Fund..............................2,629,40017   Payable from Department of Business 18  Services Special Operations Fund..................4,189,50019  For Contractual Services:20   Payable from General Revenue Fund...............17,663,30021   Payable from Road Fund...................................022   Payable from Motor Fuel Tax Fund.................1,300,00023   Payable from Lobbyist Registration Fund............155,60024   Payable from Registered Limited 25  Liability Partnership Fund............................1,40026   Payable from Securities Audit   HB5720- 5 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1  and Enforcement Fund..............................3,704,3002   Payable from Department of Business Services 3  Special Operations Fund...........................3,314,1004  For Travel Expenses:5   Payable from General Revenue Fund..................190,6006   Payable from Road Fund...................................07   Payable from Lobbyist Registration Fund..............4,5008   Payable from Securities Audit 9  and Enforcement Fund.................................45,00010   Payable from Department of Business Services 11  Special Operations Fund..............................15,50012  For Commodities:13   Payable from General Revenue Fund..................769,90014   Payable from Road Fund...................................015   Payable from Lobbyist Registration Fund..............2,50016   Payable from Registered Limited 17  Liability Partnership Fund............................3,10018   Payable from Securities Audit 19  and Enforcement Fund..................................6,20020   Payable from Department of Business Services 21  Special Operations Fund..............................15,60022  For Printing:23   Payable from General Revenue Fund..................410,20024   Payable from Road Fund...................................025   Payable from Lobbyist Registration Fund.............10,50026   Payable from Securities Audit   HB5720- 6 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1  and Enforcement Fund......................................02   Payable from Department of Business Services 3  Special Operations Fund.............................140,0004  For Equipment:5   Payable from General Revenue Fund..................934,5006   Payable from Road Fund...................................07   Payable from Lobbyist Registration Fund..............4,0008   Payable from Registered Limited 9  Liability Partnership Fund................................010   Payable from Securities Audit 11  and Enforcement Fund................................150,00012   Payable from Department of Business Services 13  Special Operations Fund..............................15,00014  For Electronic Data Processing:15   Payable from General Revenue Fund........................016   Payable from Road Fund...................................017   Payable from the Secretary of State 18  Special Services Fund.....................................019  For telecommunication services:20   Payable from General Revenue Fund...................75,70021   Payable from Road Fund...................................022   Payable from Lobbyist Registration Fund..............1,20023   Payable from Registered Limited 24  Liability Partnership Fund................................025   Payable from Securities Audit 26  and Enforcement Fund..................................1,200  HB5720- 7 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1   Payable from Department of Business Services 2  Special Operations Fund...............................6,0003  For Operation of Automotive Equipment:4   Payable from General Revenue Fund..................430,0005   Payable from Securities Audit 6  and Enforcement Fund................................192,5007   Payable from Department of Business Services 8  Special Operations Fund..............................95,0009  For Refunds:10   Payable from General Revenue Fund...................30,00011   Payable from Road Fund...........................2,000,00012MOTOR VEHICLE GROUP13For Personal Services:14  For Regular Positions:15   Payable from General Revenue Fund..............162,475,00016   Payable from Road Fund...................................017   Payable from CSLIS/AAMVAnet/NMVTIS Trust Fund............018   Payable from the Secretary of State 19  Special License Plate Fund..........................839,70020   Payable from Motor Vehicle Review 21  Board Fund..........................................145,00022   Payable from Vehicle Inspection Fund.............1,573,90023  For Extra Help:24   Payable from General Revenue Fund...............10,185,90025   Payable from Road Fund...................................026   Payable from Vehicle Inspection Fund.....................0  HB5720- 8 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1  For Employee Contribution to 2 State Employees' Retirement System:3   Payable from General Revenue Fund................3,528,5004   Payable from CDLIS/AAMVAnet/NMVTIS Trust Fund............05   Payable from the Secretary of State 6  Special License Plate Fund...........................16,8007   Payable from Motor Vehicle Review Board Fund.........2,9008   Payable from Vehicle Inspection Fund................31,5009  For State Contribution to 10 State Employees' Retirement System:11   Payable from Road Fund...................................012   Payable from CDLIS/AAMVAnet/NMVTIS Trust Fund............013   Payable from the Secretary of State 14  Special License Plate Fund..........................385,70015   Payable from Motor Vehicle Review Board Fund........66,60016   Payable from Vehicle Inspection Fund...............723,00017  For State Contribution to 18 Social Security:19   Payable from General Revenue Fund...............12,079,50020   Payable from Road Fund...................................021   Payable from CDLIS/AAMVAnet/NMVTIS Trust Fund............022   Payable from the Secretary of State 23  Special License Plate Fund...........................63,20024   Payable from Motor Vehicle Review 25  Board Fund...........................................11,10026   Payable from Vehicle Inspection Fund...............112,500  HB5720- 9 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1  For Group Insurance:2   Payable from CDLIS/AAMVAnet/NMVTIS Trust Fund............03   Payable from the Secretary of State 4  Special License Plate Fund..........................568,5005   Payable From Motor Vehicle Review 6  Board Fund................................................07   Payable from Vehicle Inspection Fund...............918,7008  For Contractual Services:9   Payable from General Revenue Fund...............23,281,60010   Payable from Road Fund...................................011   Payable from CDLIS/AAMVAnet/NMVTIS 12  Trust Fund..........................................894,00013   Payable from the Secretary of State 14  Special License Plate Fund..........................305,00015   Payable from Motor Vehicle Review 16  Board Fund...........................................25,00017   Payable from Vehicle Inspection Fund...............920,60018  For Travel Expenses:19   Payable from General Revenue Fund..................276,50020   Payable from Road Fund...................................021   Payable from CDLIS/AAMVAnet/NMVTIS 22  Trust Fund................................................023   Payable from the Secretary of State 24  Special License Plate Fund................................025   Payable from Motor Vehicle Review 26  Board Fund................................................0  HB5720- 10 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1   Payable from Vehicle Inspection Fund.....................02  For Commodities:3   Payable from General Revenue Fund..................318,4004   Payable from Road Fund...................................05   Payable from CDLIS/AAMVAnet/NMVTIS 6  Trust Fund........................................2,018,5007   Payable from the Secretary of State 8  Special License Plate Fund........................1,000,0009   Payable from Motor Vehicle 10  Review Board Fund.........................................011   Payable from Vehicle Inspection Fund................16,00012  For Printing:13   Payable from General Revenue Fund................1,181,00014   Payable from Road Fund...................................015   Payable from the Secretary of State 16  Special License Plate Fund..........................600,00017   Payable from Motor Vehicle Review 18  Board Fund................................................019   Payable from Vehicle Inspection Fund.....................020  For Equipment:21   Payable from General Revenue Fund................1,260,70022   Payable from Road Fund...................................023   Payable from CDLIS/AAMVAnet/NMVTIS Trust Fund............024   Payable from the Secretary of State 25  Special License Plate Fund................................026   Payable from Motor Vehicle Review   HB5720- 11 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1  Board Fund................................................02   Payable from Vehicle Inspection Fund.....................03  For telecommunication services:4   Payable from General Revenue Fund................1,039,1005   Payable from Road Fund...................................06   Payable from the Secretary of State 7  Special License Plate Fund...........................23,5008   Payable from Motor Vehicle Review 9  Board Fund................................................010   Payable from Vehicle Inspection Fund................10,00011  For Operation of Automotive Equipment:12   Payable from General Revenue Fund..................661,00013   Payable from Road Fund...................................014  For Refunds:15   Payable from the Motor Vehicle Review Board Fund...100,000 16    Section 10. The following named sum, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the 18Secretary of State for any operations, alterations, 19rehabilitation, and nonrecurring repairs and maintenance of 20the interior and exterior of the various buildings and 21facilities under the jurisdiction of the Office of the 22Secretary of State, including sidewalks, terraces, and grounds 23and all labor, materials, and other costs incidental to the 24above work:25  From General Revenue Fund...........................600,000   HB5720- 12 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1    Section 15. The sum of $800,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated from the State Parking Facility 3Maintenance Fund to the Secretary of State for the maintenance 4of parking facilities owned or operated by the Secretary of 5State. 6    Section 20. The following named sums, or so much thereof 7as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 8Office of the Secretary of State for the following purposes:9  For annual equalization grants, per capita and 10 area grants to library systems, and per capita 11 grants to public libraries, under Section 8 of 12 the Illinois Library System Act. This amount 13 is in addition to any amount otherwise appropriated 14 to the Office of the Secretary of State:15   From General Revenue Fund.......................36,274,900 16    Section 25. The following named sums, or so much thereof 17as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 18Office of the Secretary of State for library services for the 19blind and physically handicapped:20   From General Revenue Fund........................1,165,40021   From Accessible Electronic Information22    Service Fund............................................0   HB5720- 13 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1    Section 30. The following named sums, or so much thereof 2as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 3Office of the Secretary of State for the following purposes:4  For annual per capita grants to all school 5 districts of the State for the establishment and 6 operation of qualified school libraries or the 7 additional support of existing qualified school 8 libraries under Section 8.4 of the Illinois 9 Library System Act. This amount is in addition to 10 any amount otherwise appropriated to the Office 11 of the Secretary of State:12   From General Revenue Fund........................1,609,500 13    Section 35. The following named sums, or so much thereof 14as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the 15Secretary of State for grants to library systems for library 16computers and new technologies to promote and improve 17interlibrary cooperation and resource sharing programs among 18Illinois libraries:19   From Secretary of State Special Services Fund............0 20    Section 40. The following named sums, or so much thereof 21as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Office of the 22Secretary of State for annual library technology grants, 23special projects grants, and for direct purchase of equipment 24and services that support library development and technology   HB5720- 14 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1advancement in libraries statewide:2   From General Revenue Fund........................7,880,0003   From Secretary of State Special4    Services Fund...................................1,826,0005    Total                                          $9,706,000 6    Section 45. The following named sum, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the 8Secretary of State from the General Revenue Fund for the 9purpose of making grants to libraries for construction and 10renovation as provided in Section 8 of the Illinois Library 11System Act. This amount is in addition to any amount otherwise 12appropriated to the Office of the Secretary of State:13   From General Revenue Fund..........................870,800 14    Section 50. The following named sum, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the Office 16of the Secretary of State for the following purposes: For 17library services under the Federal Library Services and 18Technology Act, P.L. 104-208, as amended; and the National 19Foundation on the Arts and Humanities Act of 1965, P.L. 2089-209. These amounts are in addition to any amounts otherwise 21appropriated to the Office of the Secretary of State:22   From Federal Library Services Fund...............6,500,000 23    Section 55. The following named sums, or so much thereof   HB5720- 15 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 2Office of the Secretary of State for support and expansion of 3the Literacy Programs administered by education agencies, 4libraries, volunteers, or community based organizations or a 5coalition of any of the above:6   From General Revenue Fund........................5,468,3007   From Federal Library Services Fund:8   From LSTA Title IA.......................................09   From Secretary of State Special 10    Services Fund...................................1,300,000 11    Section 60. The following named sum, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the 13Secretary of State for tuition and fees and other expenses 14related to the program for Illinois Archival Depository System 15Interns:16   From General Revenue Fund................................0 17    Section 65. The sum of $0, or so much thereof as may be 18necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 19the Office of Secretary of State for the Penny Severns Summer 20Family Literacy Grants. 21    Section 70. In addition to any other sums appropriated for 22such purposes, the sum of $1,288,800, or so much thereof as may 23be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to   HB5720- 16 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1the Office of the Secretary of State for a grant to the Chicago 2Public Library. 3    Section 75. The sum of $0, or so much thereof as may be 4necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 5the Office of the Secretary of State for all expenditures and 6grants to libraries for the Project Next Generation Program. 7    Section 80. The following named sum, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the 9Secretary of State from the General Revenue Fund for the 10purpose of promotion of organ and tissue donations:11   From General Revenue Fund........................1,750,000 12    Section 85. The sum of $50,000, or so much thereof as may 13be necessary, is appropriated from the Secretary of State 14Special License Plate Fund to the Office of the Secretary of 15State for grants to benefit Illinois Veterans Home libraries. 16    Section 90. The sum of $35,000, or so much thereof as may 17be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the Secretary 18of State from the Master Mason Fund to provide grants to 19Illinois Masonic Charities Fund, a not-for-profit corporation, 20for charitable purposes. 21    Section 95. The sum of $135,000, or so much thereof as may   HB5720- 17 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1be necessary, is appropriated to the Secretary of State from 2the Illinois Pan Hellenic Trust Fund to provide grants for 3charitable purposes sponsored by African-American fraternities 4and sororities. 5    Section 100. The sum of $28,000, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, is appropriated to the Secretary of State from 7the Park District Youth Program Fund to provide grants for the 8Illinois Association of Park Districts: After School 9Programming. 10    Section 105. The sum of $220,000, or so much thereof as may 11be necessary, is appropriated to the Secretary of State from 12the Illinois Route 66 Heritage Project Fund to provide grants 13for the development of tourism, education, preservation and 14promotion of Route 66. 15    Section 110. The sum of $550,000, or so much thereof as may 16be necessary, is appropriated from the Police Memorial 17Committee Fund to the Office of the Secretary of State for 18grants to the Police Memorial Committee for maintaining a 19memorial statue, holding an annual memorial commemoration, and 20giving scholarships or grants to children and spouses of 21police officers killed in the line of duty. 22    Section 115. The following named sum, or so much thereof   HB5720- 18 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 2Office of the Secretary of State for such purposes in Section 33-646 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, for grants to the Regional 4Organ Bank of Illinois and to Mid-America Transplant Services 5for the purpose of promotion of organ and tissue donation 6awareness. These amounts are in addition to any amounts 7otherwise appropriated to the Office of the Secretary of 8State:9   From Organ Donor Awareness Fund....................125,000 10    Section 120. The sum of $400,000, or so much thereof as may 11be necessary, is appropriated to the Secretary of State from 12the Chicago Police Memorial Foundation Fund for grants to the 13Chicago Police Memorial Foundation for maintenance of a 14memorial and park, holding an annual memorial commemoration, 15giving scholarships to children of police officers killed or 16catastrophically injured in the line of duty, providing 17financial assistance to police officers and their families 18when a police officer is killed or injured in the line of duty, 19and paying the insurance premiums for police officers who are 20terminally ill. 21    Section 125. The sum of $145,000, or so much thereof as may 22be necessary, is appropriated to the Secretary of State from 23the U.S. Marine Corps Scholarship Fund to provide grants per 24Section 3-651 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.   HB5720- 19 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1    Section 130. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the SOS Federal 3Projects Fund to the Office of the Secretary of State for the 4payment of any operational expenses relating to the cost 5incident to augmenting the Illinois Commercial Motor Vehicle 6safety program by assuring and verifying the identity of 7drivers prior to licensure, including CDL operators; for 8improved security for Drivers Licenses and Personal 9Identification Cards; and any other related program deemed 10appropriate by the Office of the Secretary of State. 11    Section 135. The sum of $1,500,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the 13Secretary of State from the Securities Investors Education 14Fund for any expenses used to promote public awareness of the 15dangers of securities fraud. 16    Section 140. The sum of $200,000, or so much thereof as may 17be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the Secretary 18of State from the Secretary of State Evidence Fund for the 19purchase of evidence, for the employment of persons to obtain 20evidence, and for the payment for any goods or services 21related to obtaining evidence. 22    Section 145. The sum of $225,000, or so much thereof as may   HB5720- 20 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1be necessary, is appropriated from the Electric Vehicle Rebate 2Fund to the Office of Secretary of State for the cost of 3administering the Electric Vehicle Rebate Act. 4    Section 150. The sum of $200,000,000, or so much thereof 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Secretary of 6State Special Services Fund to the Office of the Secretary of 7State for electronic data processing, for office automation 8and technology, and for operating program expenses related to 9the enforcement of administering laws related to vehicles and 10transportation. 11    Section 155. The sum of $20,000,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated from the Motor Vehicle 13License Plate Fund to the Office of the Secretary of State for 14the cost incident to providing new or replacement plates for 15motor vehicles. 16    Section 160. The sum of $4,600,000, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, is appropriated from the Secretary of State 18DUI Administration Fund to the Office of Secretary of State 19for operation of the Department of Administrative Hearings of 20the Office of Secretary of State and for no other purpose. 21    Section 165. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, is appropriated from the Secretary of State   HB5720- 21 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1Police Services Fund to the Secretary of State for purposes as 2indicated by the grantor or contractor or, in the case of money 3bequeathed or granted for no specific purpose, for any purpose 4as deemed appropriate by the Director of the Secretary of 5State Department of Police in administering the 6responsibilities of the Secretary of State Department of 7Police. 8    Section 170. The sum of $300,000, or so much thereof as may 9be necessary, is appropriated from the Office of the Secretary 10of State Grant Fund to the Office of the Secretary of State to 11be expended in accordance with the terms and conditions upon 12which such funds were received. 13    Section 175. The sum of $24,300, or so much thereof as may 14be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the Secretary 15of State from the State Library Fund to increase the 16collection of books, records, and holdings; to hold public 17forums; to purchase equipment and resource materials for the 18State Library; and for the upkeep, repair, and maintenance of 19the State Library building and grounds. 20    Section 180. The following sum, or so much thereof as may 21be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the Secretary 22of State for any operations, alterations, rehabilitations, new 23construction, and maintenance of the interior and exterior of   HB5720- 22 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1the various buildings and facilities under the jurisdiction of 2the Secretary of State to enhance security measures in the 3Capitol Complex:4   From General Revenue Fund........................8,000,000 5    Section 185. The sum of $50,000,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the Secretary of State 7Identification Security and Theft Prevention Fund to the 8Office of Secretary of State for all costs related to 9implementing identification security and theft prevention 10measures. 11    Section 190. The sum of $10,000,000 or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the 13Secretary of State from the DMV Transformation Fund for the 14payment of costs related to the issuance of temporary 15visitor's driver's licenses, and other operational costs, 16including personnel, facilities, computer programming, and 17data transmission. 18    Section 195. The sum of $2,100,000, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, is appropriated from the Monitoring Device 20Driving Permit Administration Fee Fund to the Office of the 21Secretary of State for all Secretary of State costs associated 22with administering Monitoring Device Driving Permits per 23Public Act 95-0400.   HB5720- 23 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1    Section 200. The sum of $300,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated from the Indigent BAIID Fund to 3the Office of the Secretary of State to reimburse ignition 4interlock device providers per Public Act 95-0400, including 5reimbursements submitted in prior years. 6    Section 205. The sum of $35,000,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the 8Secretary of State from the Vehicle Hijacking and Motor 9Vehicle Theft Prevention and Insurance Verification Trust Fund 10for awards, grants, and operational support to implement the 11Illinois Vehicle Hijacking and Motor Vehicle Theft Prevention 12and Insurance Verification Act, and for operational expenses 13of the Office to implement the Act. 14    Section 210. The sum of $50,000, or so much thereof as may 15be necessary, is appropriated to the Secretary of State from 16the Illinois Professional Golfers Association Junior Golf Fund 17for grants to the Illinois Professional Golfers Association 18Foundation to help Association members expose Illinois 19youngsters to the game of golf. 20    Section 215. The sum of $170,000, or so much thereof as may 21be necessary, is appropriated to the Secretary of State from 22the Agriculture in the Classroom Fund for grants to support   HB5720- 24 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1Agriculture in the Classroom programming for public and 2private schools within Illinois. 3    Section 220. The sum of $25,000, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary, is appropriated to the Secretary of State from 5the Boy Scout and Girl Scout Fund for grants to the Illinois 6divisions of the Boy Scouts of America and the Girl Scouts of 7the U.S.A. 8    Section 225. The sum of $45,000, or so much thereof as may 9be necessary, is appropriated to the Secretary of State from 10the Support Our Troops Fund for grants to Illinois Support Our 11Troops, Inc. for charitable assistance to the troops and their 12families in accordance with its Articles of Incorporation. 13    Section 230. The sum of $4,000, or so much thereof as may 14be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the Secretary 15of State from the Rotary Club Fund for grants for charitable 16purposes sponsored by the Rotary Club. 17    Section 235. The sum of $13,000, or so much thereof as may 18be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the Secretary 19of State from the Ovarian Cancer Awareness Fund for grants to 20the National Ovarian Cancer Coalition, Inc. for ovarian cancer 21research, education, screening, and treatment.   HB5720- 25 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1    Section 240. The sum of $6,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the Secretary 3of State from the Sheet Metal Workers International 4Association of Illinois Fund for grants for charitable 5purposes sponsored by Illinois chapters of the Sheet Metal 6Workers International Association. 7    Section 245. The sum of $120,000, or so much thereof as may 8be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the Secretary 9of State from the Illinois Police Association Fund for 10providing death benefits for the families of police officers 11killed in the line of duty, and for providing scholarships, 12for graduate study, undergraduate study, or both, to children 13and spouses of police officers killed in the line of duty. 14    Section 250. The sum of $10,000, or so much thereof as may 15be necessary, is appropriated to the Secretary of State from 16the International Brotherhood of Teamsters Fund for grants to 17the Teamsters Joint Council 25 Charitable Trust for religious, 18charitable, scientific, literary, and educational purposes. 19    Section 255. The sum of $16,000, or so much thereof as may 20be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the Secretary 21of State from the Fraternal Order of Police Fund for grants to 22the Illinois Fraternal Order of Police to increase the 23efficiency and professionalism of law enforcement officers in   HB5720- 26 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1Illinois, to educate the public about law enforcement issues, 2to more firmly establish the public confidence in law 3enforcement, to create partnerships with the public, and to 4honor the service of law enforcement officers. 5    Section 260. The sum of $35,000, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, is appropriated to the Secretary of State from 7the Share the Road Fund for grants to the League of Illinois 8Bicyclists, a not for profit corporation, for educational 9programs instructing bicyclists and motorists how to legally 10and more safely share the roadways. 11    Section 265. The sum of $25,000, or so much thereof as may 12be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the Secretary 13of State from the Ducks Unlimited Fund for grants to Ducks 14Unlimited, Inc. to fund wetland protection, enhancement, and 15restoration projects in the State of Illinois, to fund 16education and outreach for media, volunteers, members, and the 17general public regarding waterfowl and wetlands conservation 18in the State of Illinois, and to cover reasonable cost for 19Ducks Unlimited plate advertising and administration of the 20wetland conservation projects and education program. 21    Section 270. The sum of $200,000, or so much thereof as may 22be necessary, is appropriated to the Secretary of State from 23the Family Responsibility Fund for all costs associated with   HB5720- 27 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1enforcement of the Family Financial Responsibility Law. 2    Section 275. The sum of $450,000, or so much thereof as may 3be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the Secretary 4of State from the Illinois State Police Memorial Park Fund for 5grants to the Illinois State Police Heritage Foundation, Inc. 6for building and maintaining a memorial and park, holding an 7annual memorial commemoration, giving scholarships to children 8of State police officers killed or catastrophically injured in 9the line of duty, and providing financial assistance to police 10officers and their families when a police officer is killed or 11injured in the line of duty. 12    Section 280. The sum of $6,000, or so much thereof as may 13be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the Secretary 14of State from the Illinois Sheriffs' Association Scholarship 15and Training Fund for grants to the Illinois Sheriffs' 16Association for scholarships obtained in a competitive process 17to attend the Illinois Teen Institute or an accredited college 18or university, for programs designed to benefit the elderly 19and teens, and for law enforcement training. 20    Section 285. The sum of $1,200,000, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the 22Secretary of State from the Alzheimer's Awareness Fund for 23grants to the Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders   HB5720- 28 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1Association, Greater Illinois Chapter, for Alzheimer's care, 2support, education, and awareness programs. 3    Section 290. The sum of $40,000, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the Secretary 5of State from the Illinois Nurses Foundation Fund for grants 6to the Illinois Nurses Foundation, to promote the health of 7the public by advancing the nursing profession in this State. 8    Section 295. The sum of $3,000, or so much thereof as may 9be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the Secretary 10of State from the Hospice Fund for grants to a statewide 11organization whose primary membership consists of hospice 12programs. 13    Section 300. The sum of $45,000, or so much thereof as may 14be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the Secretary 15of State from the Octave Chanute Aerospace Heritage Fund for 16grants to the Rantoul Historical Society and Museum, or any 17other charitable foundation responsible for the former 18exhibits and collections of the Chanute Air Museum, for 19operational and program expenses of the Chanute Air Museum and 20any other structure housing exhibits and collections of the 21Chanute Air Museum. 22    Section 305. The sum of $0, or so much thereof as may be   HB5720- 29 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1necessary, is appropriated from the Secretary of State Special 2Services Fund to the Office of the Secretary of State for 3operating program expenses related to the enforcement of 4administering laws related to vehicles and transportation. 5    Section 310. The sum of $2,500,000 or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Office of the Secretary of State for all Secretary 8of State costs associated with the implementation of the 9provisions of Article XIV of the Illinois Constitution, 10including, without limitation, the duties under the 11Constitutional Convention Act and the Illinois Constitutional 12Amendment Act. 13    Section 315. The amount of $155,000, or so much of this 14amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 15Revenue Fund to the Office of the Secretary of State for 16ordinary and contingent expenses of the Executive Inspector 17General. 18    Section 320. The amount of $15,000,000, or so much thereof 19as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the 20Secretary of State from the General Revenue Fund for deposit 21into the Secretary of State Special Services Fund for 22technology modernization and maintenance of information 23technology systems and infrastructure and other costs.   HB5720- 30 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1    Section 325. The amount of $400,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Electronic 3Notarization Fund to the Office of the Secretary of State to 4fund the Department of Index's implementation and maintenance 5of the electronic notarization commissions. 6    Section 330. The amount of $100,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the 100 Club of 8Illinois Fund to the Office of the Secretary of State for 9grants and administrative expenses associated with providing 10resources to families of first responders killed in the line 11of duty and to active duty first responders. 12    Section 335. The amount of $0, or so much thereof as may be 13necessary is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the 14Office of the Secretary of State for grants, contracts, and 15administrative expenses associated with Agudath Israel of 16Illinois for school transportation. 17    Section 340. The amount of $6,000,000, or so much thereof 18as may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Facility 19Repair and Maintenance Fund to the Office of the Secretary of 20State for repairs, maintenance, and other permanent 21improvements.   HB5720- 31 -LRB104 20767 SPS 34271 b1    Section 345. No contract shall be entered into or 2obligation incurred or any expenditure made from any 3appropriation herein made in Section 340 of this Article until 4after the purpose and amounts have been approved in writing by 5the Governor. 6    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 72026.